Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20182-3763
Dry Bean Development, Utilization, Promotion, and Education Fund; created; use; investment.

The State Treasurer shall establish in the treasury of the State of Nebraska a fund to be known as the Dry Bean Development, Utilization, Promotion, and Education Fund, to which fund shall be credited funds collected by the commission pursuant to the Dry Bean Resources Act, including license fees, royalties, or any repayments relating to the fund. The fund shall be expended for the administration of such act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1987, LB 145, § 29;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 20;

Laws 2015, LB242, § 4.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.